Vermont, session 2025-2026, S155.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to improve municipal work crew safety and
reduce traffic crashes by enabling municipal law enforcement agencies to
VT LEG #381892 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.155
2025 Page 2 of 7
participate in the automated traffic law enforcement (ATLE) pilot program
established by 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 135.
Sec. 2. 23 V.S.A. § 1606 is amended to read:
§ 1606. AUTOMATED TRAFFIC LAW ENFORCEMENT SYSTEMS;
SPEEDING
(a) Use. Deployment of ATLE systems on behalf of the Agency of
Transportation or a municipal law enforcement agency by a third party
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section is intended to investigate the benefits
of automated law enforcement for speeding violations as a way to improve
work crew safety and reduce traffic crashes resulting from an increased
adherence to traffic laws achieved by effective deterrence of potential
violators, which could not be achieved by traditional law enforcement methods
or traffic calming measures, or both. Deployment of ATLE systems on behalf
of the Agency and municipal law enforcement agencies is not intended to
replace law enforcement personnel, nor is it intended to mitigate problems
caused by deficient road design, construction, or maintenance.
(b) Vendor.
* * *
(2) A municipal law enforcement agency may enter into a contract with
a third party for the operation and deployment of ATLE systems on behalf of
the municipal law enforcement agency.
VT LEG #381892 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.155
2025 Page 3 of 7
(3) The Agency or a municipal law enforcement agency, in consultation
with the Department of Public Safety, may require the vendor to maintain a
storage system to store any recorded images or other data collected by the
ATLE system. Any storage system shall adhere to the use, retention, and
limitation requirements pursuant to this section.
(c) Locations. An ATLE system may only be utilized:
(1) at a location in the vicinity of a work zone that is located on either a
limited-access highway under the jurisdiction of the Agency of Transportation
and that is selected by the Agency or on a highway within the jurisdiction of a
municipal law enforcement agency that is selected by the law enforcement
agency, provided that:
(1)(A)(i) for a location selected by the Agency of Transportation, the
Agency shall document through an appropriate engineering analysis that the
location meets highway standards; or
(ii) for a location selected by a municipal law enforcement agency,
the municipal law enforcement agency shall confirm through an appropriate
engineering analysis that the location meets highway standards;
(2)(B) the ATLE system is not used as a means of combating
deficiencies in roadway design or environment;
VT LEG #381892 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.155
2025 Page 4 of 7
(3)(C) at least two signs notifying members of the traveling public of the
use of an ATLE system are in place before any recorded images or other data
is collected by the ATLE system;
(4)(D) there is a sign at the end of the work zone;
(5)(E) the ATLE system is only in operation when workers are present
in the work zone and at least one of the signs required under subdivision (3) of
this subsection (c) indicates whether the ATLE system is currently in
operation; and
(6)(F) there is notice of the use of the ATLE system on the Agency’s
website or, for a municipal work zone, on the Agency’s and municipality’s
websites, including the location and typical hours when workers are present
and the ATLE system is in operation; and
(2) at additional locations with a high incidence of crashes or speeding,
or both, if the municipal law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the
location determines, in its sole discretion, that it may be impractical or unsafe
to utilize traditional law enforcement methods or that the use of traditional law
enforcement personnel has failed to deter violators, provided that:
(A) the municipal law enforcement agency confirms, through a traffic
engineering analysis of the proposed location, that the location meets highway
safety standards;
VT LEG #381892 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.155
2025 Page 5 of 7
(B) the ATLE system is not used as a means of combating
deficiencies in roadway design or environment;
(C) at least two signs notifying members of the traveling public of the
use of an ATLE system are in place before any recorded images or other data
is collected by the ATLE system; and
(D) there is notice of the use of the ATLE system, including its
location, on the Agency of Transportation’s and the municipality’s websites.
(d) Daily log.
* * *
(2) The daily log shall be retained for not fewer than three years by the
Agency or the municipal law enforcement agency, as appropriate, and be
admissible in any proceeding for a violation involving ATLE systems
deployed on behalf of the Agency or the municipal law enforcement agency.
(e) Annual calibration. All ATLE systems shall undergo an annual
calibration check performed by an independent calibration laboratory. The
calibration laboratory shall issue a signed certificate of calibration after the
annual calibration check, which shall be retained for not fewer than three years
by the Agency or the municipal law enforcement agency, as appropriate, and
be admissible in any proceeding for a violation involving the ATLE system.
* * *
VT LEG #381892 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.155
2025 Page 6 of 7
(k) Review process and annual report.
(1) The Agency of Transportation, in consultation with the Department
of Public Safety, shall establish a review process to ensure that recorded
images are used only for the purposes permitted by this section. The Agency
of Transportation shall report the results of this review annually on or before
January 15 to the Senate and House Committees on Judiciary and on
Transportation. The report shall contain the following information based on
prior calendar year data:
(A) the total number of ATLE systems units being operated in the
State on behalf of the Agency in the State and on behalf of municipal law
enforcement agencies;
(B) the terms of any contracts entered into with any vendors for the
deployment of ATLE on behalf of the Agency or on behalf of municipal law
enforcement agencies;
(C) all of the locations where an ATLE system was deployed along
with the dates and hours that the ATLE system was in operation;
(D) the number of violations issued based on recorded images and
the outcomes of those violations by category, including first, second, and third
and subsequent violations and contested violations;
VT LEG #381892 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.155
2025 Page 7 of 7
(E) the number of recorded images the Agency and municipal law
enforcement agencies submitted to the automated traffic law enforcement
storage system;
(F) the total amount paid in civil penalties; and
(G) any recommended changes for the use of ATLE systems in
Vermont.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #381892 v.1